Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-23] Determination of damages. The
governor or mayor, as applicable, shall appoint a board of three disinterested
certified appraisers with whom may be filed any claim for damages arising out
of any failure to return private property, the temporary use of which was
requisitioned, or which was leased, or any claim for damages arising out of the
condition in which the private property is returned; provided that no such
claim shall be filed for deterioration of property resulting from ordinary wear
and tear, and not for any deterioration or damage, except such as is shown to
have resulted from the taking or use of the property. Any claim shall be filed
within thirty days after the return of the property or after the governor or
mayor proclaims that all private property has been returned to the owners,
whichever is earlier. The decision of the appraisers shall be final and
binding upon the governor or mayor, as applicable, and the claimant; provided
that either party may file a petition in the circuit court within sixty days
after the rendering of a decision of the board, praying for the decision of the
court upon the claim. The petition, if filed by the State, shall be entitled
in the name of the State, by the attorney general, and if filed by the county,
shall be entitled in the name of the county, by its corporation counsel, and
shall be heard and decided by the circuit court without the intervention of a
jury. If filed by any other party, the petition shall be filed, heard, and
decided in the manner provided for suits against the State. Appellate review
may be had, subject to chapter 602, in the manner provided for civil appeals
from the circuit courts. The court may order the joinder of other parties or
may allow other parties to intervene. Any award that has become final shall be
paid out of any funds available under this chapter and, if not sufficient, out
of the general revenues of the State as appropriated or out of the general
revenues of the county as appropriated. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next